Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-905.1.
Independent living services.

Local departments and licensed child-placing agencies shall provide independent living services to any person between 18 and 21 years of age who is in the process of transitioning from foster care to self-sufficiency. Any person who was committed or entrusted to a local board or licensed child-placing agency may choose to discontinue receiving independent living services any time before his twenty-first birthday in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. The local board or licensed child-placing agency shall restore independent living services at the request of that person provided that (i) the person has not yet reached 21 years of age and (ii) the person has entered into a written agreement, less than 60 days after independent living services have been discontinued, with the local board or licensed child-placing agency regarding the terms and conditions of his receipt of independent living services.

Local departments and licensed child-placing agencies shall provide independent living services to any person between 18 and 21 years of age who (a) was in the custody of the local department of social services immediately prior to his commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice, (b) is in the process of transitioning from a commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice to self-sufficiency, and (c) provides written notice of his intent to receive independent living services and enters into a written agreement for the provision of independent living services, which sets forth the terms and conditions of the provision of independent living services, with the local board or licensed child-placing agency within 60 days of his release from commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice.

Local departments shall provide any person who chooses to leave foster care or terminate independent living services before his twenty-first birthday written notice of his right to request restoration of independent living services in accordance with this section by including such written notice in the person’s transition plan. Such transition plan shall be created within 90 days prior to the person’s discharge from foster care. Local departments and licensed child-placing agencies may provide independent living services as part of the foster care services provided to any child 14 years of age or older. All independent living services shall be provided in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.

History.

2004, c. 196; 2008, cc. 187, 475, 483; 2010, c. 257; 2013, cc. 5, 362, 564; 2014, cc. 94, 134.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 564, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”

Acts 2013, c. 564, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly determines that the requirements of the second enactment of this act have been met.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 187 added the second and third sentences.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are identical, and substituted “and licensed child-placing agencies may provide” for “may provide” in the first sentence; and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 257 inserted the fourth and fifth sentences and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 5 deleted “that provide independent living services to persons between 18 and 21 years of age” following “Local departments” in the first sentence of the third paragraph, and substituted “within 90 days prior” for “at least 90 days prior” in the second sentence thereof.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 362 and 564 are identical, and divided the former provisions into the first and third paragraphs; added the second paragraph; and made a stylistic change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 94 and 134 are identical, and in the second paragraph, substituted “shall” for “may” in the first sentence.

§ 63.2-905.2.
Security freezes and annual credit checks for children in foster care.

Local departments shall request the placement of a security freeze pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-444.3 on the credit report or record of any child who is less than 16 years of age and has been in foster care for at least six months in order to prevent cases of identity theft and misuse of personal identifying information. The local department shall request removal of the security freeze (i) upon the child’s removal from foster care, (ii) upon the child’s request if the child is 16 years of age or older, or (iii) upon a determination by the local department that removal of the security freeze is in the best interest of the child.

Local departments shall conduct annual credit checks on all children 14 years of age or older but less than 18 years of age who are in foster care to identify cases of identity theft or misuse of personal identifying information of such children. Local departments shall resolve, to the greatest extent possible, cases of identity theft or misuse of personal identifying information of foster care children identified pursuant to this section.

History.

2012, c. 432; 2016, c. 631; 2019, cc. 676, 677.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 432, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop and implement policies and procedures designed to protect personal identifying information of children aged 16 years and older in foster care in order to prevent identity theft by foster care providers and others who may have access to personal identifying information of such children. In doing so, the Department shall include policies and procedures for (i) assigning unique identifying numbers other than social security numbers to children entering foster care; (ii) limiting, to the greatest extent possible, disclosure of foster children’s social security numbers and other unique identifying information to foster parents or other persons who may have access to personal identifying information about a child in foster care; and (iii) responding to valid requests for information regarding a foster child’s social security number or other personal identifying information from individuals and entities having a legitimate need for such information. The Department shall also develop policies and procedure s for conducting annual credit checks on foster children.”

Acts 2012, c. 432, cl. 3, provides: “That the Department shall report to the General Assembly on its activities to implement provisions of this act, including any recommendations for legislative or regulatory action necessary to enable the Department to implement the provisions of this act, no later than December 1, 2012.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 substituted “14 years of age” for “aged 16” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 676 and 677 are identical, added subsection A and inserted added the subsection B designation; and in subsection B, substituted “on all children 14 years of age or older but less than 18 years of age” for “on children 14 years of age and older.”

§ 63.2-905.3.
Documents provided to foster care youth.

When a child is leaving foster care upon reaching 18 years of age, unless the child has been in foster care for less than six months, the local department shall ensure that the child has, if eligible to receive, (i) a certified birth certificate, (ii) a social security card, (iii) health insurance information, (iv) a copy of the child’s health care records, and (v) a driver’s license or identification card issued by the Commonwealth.

History.

2016, c. 631.

§ 63.2-905.4.
Individuals in foster care on eighteenth birthday; enrollment in Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance.

Local departments shall ensure that any individual who was in foster care on his eighteenth birthday is enrolled, unless the individual objects, in the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance established pursuant to §

32.1-325

, provided that such individual is eligible to receive health care services under the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance and was enrolled in such program on his eighteenth birthday. Prior to enrollment, local departments shall provide such individuals with basic information about health care services provided under the state plan for medical assistance services and inform such individuals that, if eligible, they will be enrolled in the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance unless they object.

History.

2017, c. 203.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 203, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 63.2-905.5.
Survey of children aging out of foster care.

The Department shall, in coordination with the Commission on Youth, develop a process and standardized survey to gather feedback from children aging out of foster care. The survey shall include requests for information regarding the child’s experience with and opinion of the Commonwealth’s foster care services, recommendations for improvement of such services, the amount of time the child spent in the foster care system, and any other information deemed relevant by the Department of Social Services or the Commission on Youth.

History.

2017, c. 187.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 187, was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 63.2-906.
Foster care plans; permissible plan goals; court review of foster children.

Each child who is committed or entrusted to the care of a local board or to a licensed child-placing agency or who is placed through an agreement between a local board and the parent, parents or guardians, where legal custody remains with the parent, parents or guardians, shall have a foster care plan prepared by the local department, the child welfare agency, or the family assessment and planning team established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

, as specified in § 16.1-281. The representatives of such local department, child welfare agency, or team shall (i) involve in the development of the plan the child’s parent(s), except when parental rights have been terminated or the local department or child welfare agency has made diligent efforts to locate the parent(s) and such parent(s) cannot be located, relatives and fictive kin who are interested in the child’s welfare, and any other person or persons standing in loco parentis at the time the board or child welfare agency obtained custody or the board or the child welfare agency placed the child and (ii) for any child for whom reunification remains the goal, meet and consult with the child’s parent(s) or other person standing in loco parentis, provided that the parent(s) or other person has been located and parental rights have not been terminated, no less than once every two months and at all critical decision-making points throughout the child’s foster care case. If reunification is not the goal for the child, the local board, child welfare agency, or team shall provide information to the child’s parents regarding the parents’ option to voluntarily terminate parental rights, unless a parent’s parental rights have been terminated. The representatives of such department, child welfare agency, or team shall involve the child in the development of the plan if (a) the child is 12 years of age or older or (b) the child is younger than 12 years of age and such involvement is consistent with the best interests of the child. In cases where either the parent(s) or child is not involved in the development of the plan, the department, child welfare agency, or team shall include in the plan a full description of the reasons therefor in accordance with § 16.1-281.A court may place a child in the care and custody of (1) a public agency in accordance with § 16.1-251 or 16.1-252 or (2) a public or licensed private child-placing agency in accordance with § 16.1-278.2, 16.1-278.4, 16.1-278.5, 16.1-278.6, or 16.1-278.8. Children may be placed by voluntary relinquishment in the care and custody of a public or private agency in accordance with § 16.1-277.01 or §§ 16.1-277.02 and 16.1-278.3. Children may be placed through an agreement where legal custody remains with the parent, parents or guardians in accordance with §§

63.2-900

and

63.2-903

, or §

2.2-5208

.

Each child in foster care shall be assigned a permanent plan goal to be reviewed and approved by the juvenile and domestic relations district court having jurisdiction of the child’s case. Permissible plan goals are to:

Transfer custody of the child to his prior family;

Transfer custody of the child to a relative other than his prior family or to fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1305

or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

;

Finalize an adoption of the child;

Place a child who is 16 years of age or older in permanent foster care;

Transition to independent living if, and only if, the child is admitted to the United States as a refugee or asylee; or

Place a child who is 16 years of age or older in another planned permanent living arrangement in accordance with subsection A2 of § 16.1-282.1.

Each child in foster care shall be subject to the permanency planning and review procedures established in §§ 16.1-281, 16.1-282, and 16.1-282.1.

History.

2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 653; 2008, cc. 475, 483; 2009, c. 124; 2011, c. 730; 2016, c. 631; 2019, c. 446; 2020, cc. 224, 366, 934; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 254, 535.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 653, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall amend its home study regulations to allow homes to be dually approved as both foster and adoptive homes.”

Acts 2020, c. 934, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall develop clear guidance documents for local boards of social services and child-placing agencies that explain the process through which a parent may voluntarily terminate parental rights and the manner in which such information should be relayed to the parent.”

Acts 2020, c. 934, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services (the Commissioner) shall establish a work group to review the feasibility and costs of establishing a standard for supervisory spans of control that would limit the number of caseworkers that a foster care supervisor may oversee. The Commissioner shall report the findings and recommendations of the work group to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and the House Committee on Appropriations by November 30, 2020.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, cl. 2 provides: “The Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. Such regulations shall include conditions for establishing a kinship guardianship, requirements for the development and amendment of a kinship guardianship assistance agreement, and circumstances that qualify a prospective kinship guardian for exemption from the relative foster home approval process. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 653, in subsection A, inserted “prepared by the local department, the designated public or child welfare agency, or the family assessment and planning team established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

” in the first sentence, added the last three sentences and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are nearly identical, and substituted “Transition to” for “Achieve” at the beginning of subdivision B 5.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 124, in subsection A, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team” preceding “and the parent” and “designated public or” preceding “child welfare agency”; inserted “child welfare” in three places; in the second sentence, substituted “child welfare agency” for “other designated agency” and “child welfare agency” for “public agency” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 730 rewrote subdivision B 5.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 added “in accordance with § 16.1-281” at the end of the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A; substituted “a child who is 16 years of age or older” for “the child” in subdivisions B 4 and B 6.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 446 substituted “such local department” for “such department,” inserted “(i),” deleted “of social services” preceding “or child welfare,” and added clause (ii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by cc. 224 and 366 are identical, and added “or to fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1305

” in subdivision B 2.

The 2020 amendment by c. 934 inserted the third-to-last sentence in subsection A, first paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “Federal-Funded” and “or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

” in subdivision B 2.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 535, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A in the first paragraph, moved “in the development of the plan” from following to preceding “the child’s parent(s)” and inserted “relatives and fictive kin who are interested in the child’s welfare” in clause (i) and inserted “(a) the child is 12 years of age or older or (b) the child is younger than 12 years of age and”; and in the second paragraph, substituted “(1)” for “(a)” and “or (2)” for “and (b).”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-289 Permanency Planning Order.

§ 63.2-906.1.
Qualified residential treatment programs.

In cases in which a child is placed by a local board or licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

63.2-100

, the foster care plan shall include (i) a description of the reasonable and good faith efforts made by the local department to identify and include on the child’s family and permanency team all appropriate biological relatives, fictive kin, professionals, and, if the child is 14 years of age or older, members of the child’s case planning team that were selected by the child in accordance with subsection A of § 16.1-281; (ii) contact information for all members of the child’s family and permanency team and for other family members and fictive kin; (iii) evidence that all meetings of the family and permanency team are held at a time and place convenient for the child’s family; (iv) if reunification is the goal for the child, evidence demonstrating that the parent from whom the child was removed provided input on the members of the family and permanency team; (v) the assessment report prepared pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in §

63.2-100

and evidence that such assessment was conducted in conjunction with the child’s family and permanency team; (vi) the placement preferences of the child and the family and permanency team with recognition that the child should be placed with his siblings unless the court finds that such placement is contrary to the best interest of the child; and (vii) if the placement preferences of the child and the family and permanency team differ from the placement recommended in the assessment report prepared pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in §

63.2-100

, the reasons why the preferences of the child and the family and permanency team were not recommended.

In all cases in which a child is placed by a local board or licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

63.2-100

, a hearing shall be held in accordance with the provisions of subsection E of § 16.1-281 within 60 days of such placement.

If any child 13 years of age or older is placed in a qualified residential treatment program for more than 12 consecutive months or 18 nonconsecutive months, or any child 12 years of age or younger is placed in a qualified residential treatment program for more than six consecutive or nonconsecutive months, the Commissioner shall submit to the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services (i) the most recent versions of the evidence and documentation required under subdivision E 2 of § 16.1-281 and (ii) a written approval, signed by the Commissioner, for the continued placement of the child in the qualified residential treatment program.

History.

2019, cc. 282, 688.

§ 63.2-907.
Administrative review of children in foster care.

Each local board shall establish and keep current a social service plan with service objectives and shall provide the necessary social services for achievement of a permanent home for each child for whom it has care and custody or has an agreement with the parents or guardians to place in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. Each local board shall review the cases of children placed through an agreement or in its custody in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Board. Each local board shall review the cases of children placed through an agreement or in its custody on a planned basis to evaluate the current status and effectiveness (i) of the service plan’s objectives and (ii) of the services being provided for each child in custody, which are directed toward the immediate care of and planning for permanency for the child, in accordance with policies of the Board.

The Department shall establish and maintain (a) a system to review and monitor compliance by local boards with the policies adopted by the Board and (b) a tracking system of every child in the care and custody of or placed by local boards in order to monitor the effectiveness of service planning, service objectives and service delivery by the local boards that shall be directed toward the achievement of permanency for children in foster care. As part of the system to review and monitor compliance by local boards, the Department shall establish and maintain an online dashboard, to be updated quarterly, that is accessible by local boards. Such dashboard shall be categorized by local board and include information regarding (1) the number of children who did not receive all required caseworker visits and the amount of time that has lapsed since each child’s last visit; (2) the number of children placed in children’s residential facilities; (3) the number of children who have been in foster care for more than 24 months, 36 months, and 48 months; (4) safety concerns identified in case reviews and whether such concerns have been alleviated; (5) the number of foster care caseworkers with caseloads exceeding the standard established pursuant to §

63.2-913.1

; (6) the number of children in foster care to whom a caseworker with a caseload exceeding the standard set forth in §

63.2-913.1

has been assigned; and (7) the turnover rate of entry-level and experienced foster care caseworkers. Local boards shall provide to the Department any data and information necessary to populate the dashboard.

The Board shall adopt regulations necessary to implement the procedures and policies set out in this section. The Board shall establish as a goal that at any point in time the number of children who are in foster care for longer than twenty-four months shall not exceed 5,500 children.

History.

1977, c. 634, § 63.1-56.2; 1982, c. 171; 1994, c. 865; 2002, c. 747; 2019, c. 446.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 446 added the last 3 sentences in the second paragraph.

§ 63.2-908.
Permanent foster care placement.

Permanent foster care placement means the place in which a child has been placed pursuant to the provisions of §§

63.2-900

,

63.2-903

and this section with the expectation and agreement between the placing agency and the place of permanent foster care that the child shall remain in the placement until he reaches the age of majority unless modified by court order or unless removed pursuant to § 16.1-251 or §

63.2-1517

. A permanent foster care placement may be a place of residence of any natural person or persons deemed appropriate to meet a child’s needs on a long-term basis.

A local department or a licensed child-placing agency shall have authority pursuant to a court order to place a child who is 16 years of age or older over whom it has legal custody in a permanent foster care placement where the child shall remain until attaining majority or thereafter, until the age of 21 years, if such placement is a requisite to providing funds for the care of such child, so long as the child is a participant in an educational, treatment or training program approved pursuant to regulations of the Board. No such child shall be removed from the physical custody of the foster parents in the permanent care placement except upon order of the court or pursuant to § 16.1-251 or §

63.2-1517

. The department or agency so placing a child shall retain legal custody of the child. A court shall not order that a child be placed in permanent foster care unless it finds that (i) diligent efforts have been made by the local department to place the child with his natural parents and such efforts have been unsuccessful, and (ii) diligent efforts have been made by the local department to place the child for adoption and such efforts have been unsuccessful or adoption is not a reasonable alternative for a long-term placement for the child under the circumstances.

Unless modified by the court order, the foster parent in the permanent foster care placement shall have the authority to consent to surgery, entrance into the armed services, marriage, application for a motor vehicle and driver’s license, application for admission into an institution of higher education, and any other such activities that require parental consent and shall have the responsibility for informing the placing department or agency of any such actions.

Any child placed in a permanent foster care placement by a local department shall, with the cooperation of the foster parents with whom the permanent foster care placement has been made, receive the same services and benefits as any other child in foster care pursuant to §§

63.2-319

,

63.2-900

and

63.2-903

and any other applicable provisions of law.

The Board shall establish minimum standards for the utilization, supervision and evaluation of permanent foster care placements.

The rate of payment for permanent foster care placements by a local department shall be in accordance with standards and rates established by the Board. The rate of payment for such placements by other licensed child-placing agencies shall be in accordance with standards and rates established by the individual agency.

If the child has a continuing involvement with his natural parents, the natural parents should be involved in the planning for a permanent placement. The court order placing the child in a permanent placement shall include a specification of the nature and frequency of visiting arrangements with the natural parents.

Any change in the placement of a child in permanent foster care or the responsibilities of the foster parents for that child shall be made only by order of the court which ordered the placement pursuant to a petition filed by the foster parents, local department, licensed child-placing agency or other appropriate party.

History.

1977, c. 559, § 63.1-206.1; 1978, c. 671; 1984, c. 70; 2002, c. 747; 2016, c. 631.

Cross references.

As to permanency planning hearing for children in foster care, see § 16.1-282.1. As to Virginia taxable income of residents, see §

58.1-322

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “an institution of higher education” was substituted for “college” in subsection C to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 inserted “who is 16 years of age or older” and substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in the first sentence of subsection B.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-290 Permanent Foster Care Placement Order.

§ 63.2-909.
Child support for child placed in foster care by court.

Pursuant to § 16.1-290, responsible persons shall pay child support for a child placed in foster care from the date that custody was awarded to the local department. The court order shall state the names of the responsible persons obligated to pay support, and either specify the amount of the support obligation pursuant to §§

20-108.1

and

20-108.2

or indicate that the Division of Child Support Enforcement will establish the amount of the support obligation. In fixing the amount of support, the court or the Division of Child Support Enforcement shall consider the extent to which the payment of support by the responsible person may affect the ability of such responsible person to implement a foster care plan developed pursuant to § 16.1-281.

History.

1995, c. 817, § 63.1-204.2; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-910.
Child support for child placed in foster care where legal custody remains with parent or guardian.

Responsible persons shall pay child support for a child placed in foster care through an agreement where legal custody remains with the parent or guardian pursuant to subdivision A 4 of § 16.1-278.2 or §

63.2-900

, from the date that the child was placed in foster care. The agreement between the parents and the local board shall include provisions for the payment of child support. In fixing the amount of support, the court, the Division of Child Support Enforcement, and the local board shall consider the extent to which the payment of support by the responsible person may affect the ability of such responsible person to implement a foster care plan. If the responsible person fails or refuses to pay such sum on a timely basis, the local board may petition the juvenile court to order such payment.

History.

1995, c. 817, § 63.1-204.3; 1997, c. 420; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 124.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 124 deleted “or public agency” following “local board” in the second and last sentences and in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “and” following “Division of Child Support Enforcement” and deleted “or the public agency” following “local board.”

§ 63.2-910.1.
Acceptance of children by local departments of social services.

A local department of social services has the authority to take custody of abandoned children, to arrange appropriate placements for abandoned children, including foster care, and to institute proceedings for the termination of parental rights of abandoned children as provided in this title and Title 16.1.

History.

2003, cc. 816, 822.

Law Review.

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 63.2-910.2.
Petition to terminate parental rights.

If a child has been in foster care under the responsibility of a local board for 15 of the most recent 22 months or if the parent of a child in foster care has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes (i) murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred, or the other parent of the child; or (ii) felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense, the local board shall file a petition to terminate the parental rights of the child’s parents and concurrently identify, recruit, process, and approve a qualified family for adoption of the child, unless:

At the option of the local board, the child is being cared for by a relative;

The local board has determined that the filing of such a petition would not be in the best interests of the child and has documented a compelling reason for such determination in the child’s foster care plan, such as (i) a relative has shown the will and ability to care for the child or (ii) the parent’s incarceration or participation in a court-ordered residential substance abuse treatment program constitutes the primary factor in the child’s placement in foster care, and termination of parental rights is not in the child’s best interests; or

The local board has not provided to the family of the child, within the time period established in the child’s foster care plan, services deemed necessary for the child’s safe return home or has not otherwise made reasonable efforts to return the child home, if required under § 473(a)(15)(B)(ii) of Title IV-E of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 673).

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

History.

2017, c. 190; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 535.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 535, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “such as (i) a relative has shown the will and ability to care for the child or (ii) the parent’s incarceration or participation in a court-ordered residential substance abuse treatment program constitutes the primary factor in the child’s placement in foster care, and termination of parental rights is not in the child’s best interests” in subdivision A 2.

§ 63.2-911.
Liability insurance for foster parents.

The Department may provide liability insurance for civil matters for persons providing basic foster care services in foster homes, as defined in §§

63.2-100

and

63.2-905

, that are approved by local boards for children in their custody or children who the board has entered into an agreement to place where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians.

History.

1978, c. 291, § 63.1-56.3; 1994, c. 865; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-912.
Visitation of child placed in foster care.

The circuit courts and juvenile and domestic relations district courts shall have the authority to grant visitation rights to the natural parents, siblings, and grandparents of any child entrusted or committed to foster care if the court finds (i) that the parent, sibling, or grandparent had an ongoing relationship with the child prior to his being placed in foster care and (ii) it is in the best interests of the child that the relationship continue. The order of the court committing the child to foster care shall state the nature and extent of any visitation rights granted as provided in this section.

History.

1985, c. 583, § 63.1-204.1; 2002, c. 747; 2008, c. 188.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 188 inserted “siblings” and “sibling” in the first sentence.

Research References.

Child Custody and Visitation Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-285 Dispositional Order for Underlying Petition, Foster Care Plan.

§ 63.2-913.
Establishment of minimum training requirements.

The Department shall, pursuant to Board regulations, establish minimum training requirements and shall provide educational programs for foster and adoption workers employed by the local department and their supervisors.

History.

2008, cc. 133, 700.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2008 acts having been §

63.2-914

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 133 and 700, cl. 2 provides: “That any costs associated with complying with the provisions of this act shall be absorbed by the Department of Social Services within the funds appropriated to it by the General Assembly for training and assistance to local staff.”

§ 63.2-913.1.
Caseload standard.

The Department shall, pursuant to Board regulations, establish a caseload standard that limits the amount of foster care cases that may be assigned to each foster care caseworker. Such caseload standard shall be reviewed and updated, as appropriate, annually on the basis of the time and work necessary to effectively manage each foster care case.

History.

2019, c. 446.

§ 63.2-914.
(Repealed) Not in effect.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 678, enacted §

63.2-914

, pertaining to “A Place of My Own” Program.

Acts 2009, c. 678, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2010 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” As of May 2012, no funds were available. This section has thus been deleted at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2009, c. 678, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on June 30, 2012, if no moneys have been deposited into the A Place of My Own Program Fund, established pursuant to §

63.2-914

of the Code of Virginia.” As of May 2012, no deposits had been made into the A Place of My Own Program Fund.